Hawaii, session 2026, HB2531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This shall be known and may be cited as "The Hawaii Student Vote For Our Future Act". SECTION 2.  The legislature recognizes that civic participation is fundamental to a healthy democracy and that young adults aged eighteen to twenty-four represent a growing portion of Hawaii's electorate.  However, the legislature finds that, according to the United States Census Bureau, fewer than forty per cent of young adults participated in state elections from 2014 to 2024.  The legislature notes that section 11-12, Hawaii Revised Statutes, reduces barriers to voter registration by permitting who are at least seventeen years of age to register to vote if they will be eighteen years of age by the date of the next election.  The same law also permits individuals who are at least sixteen years of age but who will not be eighteen years of age by the date of the next election to preregister to vote, so that they may be automatically registered to vote when they reach age eighteen. The legislature further finds that voting at a young age creates and empowers lifelong voters.  Data shows that after an individual votes once, the individual often becomes a habitual voter.  However, the legislature also recognizes that young people are the least likely to vote.  Data shows that this lack of participation is primarily the result of informational and time barriers, which have pronounced effects on youth from low‑income backgrounds, who are twice as likely to miss registration deadlines or run out of time.  By making information on voter preregistration and registration more accessible for persons sixteen years of age and older, the State can empower a new generation of lifelong voters.  The legislature believes that public schools, including charter schools, are excellent venues for preregistering and registering students to vote, since schools already require participation in a democracy and civics class for graduation, and therefore have the foundation to help increase civic engagement. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to increase voter participation and encourage civic engagement in Hawaii's public schools by ensuring students receive nonpartisan information on how to properly preregister or register to vote before reaching voting age. SECTION 3.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding two new sections to part II, subpart C, to be appropriateely designated and to read as follows: "§302A- Voter registration and preregistration education.  (a)  Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, each student enrolled in a public high school shall receive information on voter preregistration and registration procedures.  The manner in which information shall be provided shall be at the discretion of the administrative body of a each respective department school or charter school and may include information disseminated through in-class instruction, an existing educational or enrichment program, or other appropriate means. The information provided shall include, at minimum: (1)  Voting eligibility information and guidance published by the office of elections; (2)  Procedures for properly completing and submitting a voter registration application to the Hawaii online voter registration system, the appropriate county clerk, or through other lawful means; (3)  Information on opportunities to register to vote; and (4)  Information on opportunities for students sixteen years of age or older to volunteer at a voter service center, including information on how to sign up through the office of elections website. (b)  Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, voter registration and preregistration materials shall be made available to students in each public high school and shall include, at minimum: (1)  Paper copies of voter registration and preregistration application forms; and (2)  Resources describing accessible voting options and accommodations available to students who require assistance to vote due to a disability, visual or hearing impairment, or inability to read or write. (c)  If a student, or a student's parent or legal guardian, requests a voter registration application or information, the student's school shall either provide a paper copy of a voter registration application or refer the requestor to the Hawaii online voter registration system. (d) To implement this section, the department and commission may enter into one or more contracts with nonprofit organizations with demonstrated experience in providing nonpartisan civic educational resources; provided that any contracted nonprofit organization's fulfillment of its obligations shall be strictly monitored and reviewed by either the department or the commission, as applicable. §302A-     High school voter registration and preregistration week.  Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the last two full weeks in September of each year shall be designated as "high school voter registration and preregistration weeks".  During these weeks, public high school students shall be invited to participate in activities related to registering and preregistering to vote.  The activities shall be designed to: (1)  Raise civic awareness among high school students; (2)  Encourage eligible students aged sixteen or seventeen to preregister or register to vote, as applicable; and (3)  Include, to the extent available, state or county election employees or officials who can preregister and register students and school personnel on public school campuses.  Registration events shall be held in areas  reasonably accessible to all students, as designated by the administrative body of the school." SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________